Washington statutes.
RCW 33.46.080

Transfer of securities—Conformance to state association laws, when.

All mortgages, notes, and other securities of any bank that has been converted into an association shall, on request of the association, be delivered to it by the director of financial institutions or, under the direction of the director, by any depository having possession thereof. If the association is a state association it shall, as soon as practicable and within such time and by such methods as the director may direct, cause its organization, its securities and investments, the character of its business, and its methods of transacting the same to conform to the laws applicable to state associations.

[ 1994 c 92 s 476; 1982 c 3 s 87; 1975 1st ex.s. c 83 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.